Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 12 Party Committees and Conventions

17-12-1.
Selection of state committees.

Party state committees shall be selected in the manner provided by statute or party rule. Any party may, by a duly enacted party rule, elect to choose the members of its party state committee pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15 of this title or by any other method agreeable to the party state committee; provided, that where the method of selecting party state committee now in force is by caucus, selection shall subsequently be made at a primary election pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15 of this title until another method of selection is adopted by the party state committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 3A; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-2

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-12-2.
Composition and powers of state committees.

The state committee of a political party shall be composed as determined by the party. It shall have:

General oversight of all conventions of its party;

Power to make rules not inconsistent with law for the guidance and control of all the political committees of its party;

Power to make a final nomination for any state office for which no primary nomination has been made and any local office for which no nomination has been made by any authorized city, town, ward, or district committee or any duly authorized subcommittee; provided, that the state committee shall not be permitted, more than twenty-four (24) hours after the deadline for the filing of declarations of candidacy, to make a nomination for any office upon the failure of a candidate of that party to file for that public office. Nominations for such office shall be filed in the same location as the declaration of candidacy for such office pursuant to the requirements of §

17-14-1

of the general laws. Individuals nominated under this section must have been eligible for the nomination on the dates as required by and pursuant to the requirements of §§

17-14-1

.1,

17-14-2

and

17-14-2.1

of the general laws and must then meet the respective requirements for filing sufficient nomination papers set forth in chapter 14; and

Power to fill vacancies in its own membership and as provided in chapter 15 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 4; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 349, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 350, § 1.

17-12-2.1.
Political party state committee rules or bylaws.

All political party state committee rules or bylaws and any amendments to them must be filed with the state board of elections within thirty (30) days of their adoption.

If a political party duly adopts a rule or bylaw consistent with state law relating to or affecting the conduct of an election held pursuant to this title, as determined by the board of elections, this rule or bylaw shall not affect any election which occurs less than one hundred eighty (180) days following the date of filing of any rule or bylaw with the state board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 71.

17-12-3.
Delegation of powers by state committee.

The state committee of a political party may delegate its authority, by rules or resolutions, to its executive committee, or any duly selected subcommittee of the executive committee, to act when the entire committee is not in session.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 4; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2563, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-4

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-12-4.
Endorsements by state committee.

The state committee or the executive committee or any duly selected subcommittee of the executive committee acting under delegated authority may, when the town or district committee has failed or neglected to do so, within twenty-four (24) weekday hours of the failure, endorse and notify the local board of endorsement, if any, of the local candidates to be voted on in the primary. It shall also notify the secretary of state of the endorsement, if any, of any candidate to be voted for by the state at large; provided, that the endorsement of any candidate for representative in congress shall be by the members of the state committee who shall be from that particular congressional district. It shall also notify the secretary of state of the endorsement, if any, of any candidate for state senator or state representative. The endorsement shall be filed with the secretary of state not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the second day after the final day for filing declarations of candidacy. In the event the state committee, or the executive committee or any duly selected subcommittee of the executive committee acting under delegated authority, fails or neglects to endorse, then all party candidates shall be issued nomination papers without endorsement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 4; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2563, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2923, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-5

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 400, § 1.

17-12-5.
Acting in other contingencies.

Any other contingency that arises pursuant to the provisions of the statutes with respect to the election of candidates for state or town office at any general, primary, or special election shall be met by the vote of the state committee, or the executive committee, or any duly selected subcommittee of the executive committee, of a political party, or by the state chairperson of the political party if so authorized. If any contingency arises under the provisions of the statutes with respect to the election of candidates for city office at any general, primary, or special election, it shall be met by vote of the city committee of a political party or the executive committee of the city committee or any duly elected subcommittee of the executive committee, or by the city chairperson of the political party if so authorized. For the purposes of this section, the term “contingency” means and includes the nonexistence of any required party committee, the failure of any existing party committee to act, an adjudication that a primary election is void, and the death, incapacity, or moving from the jurisdiction of a party’s nominee prior to a general or special election. This section shall apply notwithstanding any provision of chapter 17 of this title to the contrary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 4; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2563, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2923, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-6

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 36, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 3.

17-12-6.
Election of town and ward committees.

The party voters of each political party in each ward of each of the cities of the state shall, biennially, in every even year, at the primary election held to nominate party candidates, elect a ward committee for each ward; provided, that the ward committees in the city of Providence shall be elected quadrennially, and the party voters of each political party in each of the towns of the state shall, biennially at the primary election, elect a town committee for the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 5; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-7

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74.

17-12-6.1.
Composition of town committees in Johnston.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

17-12-6

and

17-12-7

, the town committees of the town of Johnston shall consist of twenty-five (25) members; five (5) each to be elected from the qualified electors of the five (5) council districts of the town comprising the respective candidates from each district receiving the most votes in each district. The five (5) members elected from each district shall constitute a council district committee, which shall organize and endorse the council and school committee candidates from each district. The town committee shall elect a chairperson and provide the endorsement for the party candidate for mayor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 96, § 1.

17-12-7.
Composition of city and district committees — Appointment.

The members of the several ward committees in each city of the same political party shall constitute the city committee of the political party for that city. For each of the political parties, there shall be a senatorial district committee for each senatorial district to consist of five (5) members where the senatorial district is contained within a single city or town, and to consist of seven (7) members where the senatorial district includes all or parts of two (2) or more cities or towns. Senatorial district committee members shall, in the first instance, be appointed by the chairperson of the state committee of the party. There shall be a representative district committee for each representative district to consist of three (3) members where the representative district is contained within a single city or town, and to consist of five (5) members where the representative district includes all or parts of two (2) or more cities or towns. Representative district committee members shall, in the first instance, be appointed by the chairperson of the state committee of the party. The senatorial and representative district committee members shall be qualified electors of their respective districts and shall hold office respectively from the date of their appointment and until the next election of the committees, and thereafter until their successors have been elected, qualified, and organized.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 4, § 7.

17-12-8.
Qualifications and terms of committee members.

No member of a ward, town, or district committee shall hold or continue to hold membership on the ward, town, or district committee, unless that member is a qualified elector of the ward, town, or district.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, ward, district, town, and city committee members shall hold office, respectively, from the date of their election until the next election of the committees, and thereafter until their successors has been duly elected, qualified, and organized.

Candidates for ward, town, or district committee members shall file declarations of candidacy biennially, in every even year, in accordance with §

17-14-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 5; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-9

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 248, § 1.

17-12-9.
Organization of city, town, and district committees — Officers — Lists of officers and members.

All city, town, and district committees shall organize biennially in the month of January in every odd year; provided, that the city committee of the city of Providence shall organize quadrennially.

Each city committee organized under this section may elect not exceeding three (3) officers outside its membership from among the voters of the same political party in the city, and the officers shall, by virtue of their election, become members of the city committee and shall hold office until the next organization meeting of the committee.

Each city committee, town committee, and district committee, within ten (10) days after its organization, shall file with the secretary of state and with the local board a list of its officers and members.

The chairperson of the city committee of each political party in the city of Providence shall appoint the members of a ward committee for each of the several wards of the city of Providence. These appointed ward committee members shall hold office until their successors shall have been duly elected, qualified, and organized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-10

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 74.

17-12-9.1.
Members of ward committees for the city of East Providence.

The chairperson of the East Providence city committee for each political party shall appoint the members of a ward committee for each of the several wards of the city of East Providence. These appointed ward committee members shall hold office until their successors shall have been duly elected, qualified, and organized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 432, § 1.

17-12-10.
Rules and management by city, town, and district committees.

City, town, and district committees of each political party may make rules not inconsistent with the rules of the state committee, and except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the general management of the affairs of each political party in the respective cities, towns, and districts shall be vested in the city, town, or district committee, respectively, subject to all state committee rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-11

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-12-11.
Endorsement by local committees.

Each town, ward, and city committee shall file with the appropriate local board the list of candidates in the town, ward, or city which have the endorsement of the committees.

Endorsements by town, ward, and city committees shall be signed by three (3) officers of the committee.

Each district committee shall file with the board of canvassers of the city or town of residence of the senatorial or representative candidate endorsed, except that if the candidate is a resident of Providence the endorsement shall be filed with the secretary of state, the list of candidates in the district which have the endorsement of the committee.

Endorsements by district committees shall be signed by a majority of those members presently on the committee.

Endorsements shall be filed with the appropriate local board or the secretary of state, as the case may be, not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. of the day after the last day for filing declarations of candidacy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 5; P.L. 1952, ch. 2923, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-12

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 248, § 1.

17-12-12.
Vacancies in district committees.

In the event that the candidates elected to a district committee from a district do not equal the number of party committee members to which the district is entitled to be represented under provisions of §

17-12-7

, a vacancy or vacancies exist to the extent of the difference between the number of elected members and the number of members by which the district is entitled to be represented. When the vacancy or vacancies exist, they shall be filled by the committee to which insufficient members were elected, in the manner provided for in this section.

In the event of the appointment or election to a committee of an ineligible person, or whenever any member of the committee dies, resigns, or becomes incapacitated to act, or removes from the jurisdiction of the committee, or ceases to be a member of the political party, a vacancy exists which shall be filled by appointment by the committee in which the ineligibility or vacancy occurs. The removal of residence by an elected or appointment member of a committee from the district from which he or she has been elected or appointed a member of that committee shall constitute his or her resignation from the committee.

Any vacancy occurring in any of the officers and/or membership of the district committees shall be filled by the remaining members of the committee. A statement of that action by any committee shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the local board.

If any vacancy occurs with respect to the membership of a district committee, and the vacancy is not filled within forty-five (45) days of the date of notice of the vacancy to the remaining members of the committee, the vacancy shall be filled by the state committee of the political party involved, the executive committee of the state committee or any duly elected subcommittee of the executive committee or by the state chairperson of the political party if so authorized. A statement of that action shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the local board.

In the event a district committee shall not organize or reorganize pursuant to §

17-12-9

, the incumbent senator or representative, or the state committee chairperson in the case of the party not affiliated with the senator or representative, shall appoint a district committee which shall be the lawful district committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-13

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 248, § 1.

17-12-12.1.
Vacancies in city or ward committees.

Any vacancy occurring in any of the offices and/or membership of city, town, or ward committees shall be filled by the remaining members of the committee. A statement of that action by any committee shall be filed as in the case of officers and members first chosen.

If any vacancy occurs either with respect to any office of a city or ward committee or with respect to the membership of any city or ward committee, and the vacancy is not filled within forty-five (45) days of the date upon which the vacancy occurs pursuant to the provisions of §

17-12-12

, the vacancy shall be filled by the city committee of the political party involved or the executive committee of the city committee or any duly elected subcommittee of the executive committee or by the city chairperson of the political party if so authorized. The committee shall file a statement setting forth the appointment or appointments as in the case of officers and members first chosen in accordance with §

17-12-11

.

A statement of that action by any committee shall be filed as in the case of officers and members first chosen in accordance with §

17-12-11

.

The removal of residence by an elected or appointment member of a ward committee from the ward from which he or she has been elected or appointed shall constitute his or her resignation from the city or ward committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 36, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 71, § 1.

17-12-12.2.
Failure of ward and city committees to endorse.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special act to the contrary, in the event that a ward committee or a city committee of a political party of a particular city has failed or neglected to do so, the executive committee of the city committee of that city, any duly selected subcommittee of the executive committee or the city chairperson of the political party involved, if so authorized, within twenty-four (24) weekday hours of the failure, may endorse and notify the local board of the endorsement, if any, of the candidates for city council, ward committee member, and mayor, as the case may be, to be voted on in the primary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 36, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 4.

17-12-13.
State conventions.

There shall be held not later than October 14 of every even year a state convention for each political party. The nominees of a party for senator and for representatives in congress, for the five (5) general offices, and for membership in the general assembly shall be delegates to the state convention of that party. In presidential election years, these conventions shall select the party nominees for presidential electors and their names shall be placed on the ballot for the forthcoming election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 33; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-14

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 7; P.L. 2018, ch. 50, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 52, § 1.

17-12-14.
Election of delegates to national conventions.

The local boards of the several cities and towns of the state are authorized and directed to furnish for the use of any political party in this state, upon written request of the chairperson of the state central committee, acting under a resolution of the committee, voting places in which primary meetings may be held to elect delegates to the national convention of the political party. The boards shall have the voting places open on the date and during the hours requested by the chairperson of the committee, so long as that election of delegates is scheduled on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday of any month, and shall furnish to the officers appointed to act at the primary meetings any paraphernalia, including check lists, that are generally required and used in elective meetings; provided, that the political party first requesting the use of the voting places on and for a certain date shall be entitled to the use of them on that date; and if the date is one requested by some other political party, the other political party, through the chairperson of the committee, may request another date. In cities a voting place and paraphernalia for voting shall be furnished and provided for each ward into which the cities may be divided; and in each of the towns of Burrillville, Cumberland, and Lincoln, at least two (2) voting places and the paraphernalia for voting, and in every other town at least one voting place and the paraphernalia for voting, shall be furnished and provided. The local boards shall not be required to provide for the compensation for services of the officers appointed to act at the primary meetings, nor shall anything contained in this section be held to affect the method of holding elections already provided for by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 815, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 8, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 313, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-15

; G.L. 1956, §

17-12-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 9; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 5.

17-12-15.
Qualifying as a political party through independent candidacy.

An independent candidate for governor or president of the United States in a general election shall not be entitled to establish a political party, notwithstanding that the candidate shall receive five percent (5%) of the votes cast as provided in §

17-1-2(9)

, unless the candidate shall, at the time of filing a declaration of candidacy, simultaneously indicate, on a form provided by the secretary of state, the candidate’s intent to establish a political party, together with the name of the political organization which the candidate represents and the names and addresses of the chairperson and secretary of the organization.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 185, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 416, § 3.

17-12-16.
Qualifying as a political party by petition — Names of officers — Endorsements and other official communications.

Any political organization wishing to qualify as a political party by the submission of petitions under §

17-1-2(9)

shall, at the time of receiving the petition forms from the board of elections, file with the board, on a form to be provided by the board, the name of the political organization and the names and addresses of its chairperson and secretary. If the organization later qualifies as a political party by the submission of the requisite number of valid signatures, and until the appropriate party committees have been established, all endorsements and other official written communications from the party to the board of elections, secretary of state, local boards of canvassers and other state and municipal agencies shall be signed on behalf of the party by the chairperson and secretary, whose names and addresses are on file with the board of elections as required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 185, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 416, § 3.

17-12-17.
Names of political parties.

No political party may use or adopt a name which is similar to the name of another political party or which contains the name of another political party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 342, § 2.